Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.285

Dual credit programs—Impact on financial aid eligibility—Guidelines.

The superintendent of public instruction and the office of student financial assistance shall develop advising guidelines to assure that students and parents understand that college credits earned in high school dual credit programs may impact eligibility for financial aid.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 131; 2009 c 450 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 450: See note following RCW 28A.600.280.